Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.010

Where brought—Change of venue.

Any person or corporation having any claim against the state of Washington shall have a right of action against the state in the superior court.

The venue for such actions shall be as follows:

(1) The county of the residence or principal place of business of one or more of the plaintiffs;

(2) The county where the cause of action arose;

(3) The county in which the real property that is the subject of the action is situated;

(4) The county where the action may be properly commenced by reason of the joinder of an additional defendant; or

(5) Thurston county.

Actions shall be subject to change of venue in accordance with statute, rules of court, and the common law as the same now exist or may hereafter be amended, adopted, or altered.

Actions shall be tried in the county in which they have been commenced in the absence of a seasonable motion by or in behalf of the state to change the venue of the action.

[ 1986 c 126 s 1; 1973 c 44 s 1; 1963 c 159 s 1; 1927 c 216 s 1; 1895 c 95 s 1; RRS s 886.]

NOTES:

Severability—1963 c 159: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any persons or circumstances is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1963 c 159 s 12.]

Venue: Chapter 4.12 RCW.